Utah statutes.
59-2-908.   Single aggregate limitation -- Maximum levy.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each county shall have a single
aggregate limitation on the property tax levied for all purposes by the
county.  Except as provided in Section 59-2-911, this limitation may not
exceed the maximum set forth in this section.  The maximum is:
(a)  .0032 per dollar of taxable value in all counties with a total taxable
value of more than $100,000,000; and
(b)  .0036 per dollar of taxable value in all counties with a total taxable
value of less than $100,000,000.
(2) (a)  Beginning January 1, 1995, a county may impose a tax rate in excess
of the limitation provided in Subsection (1) if the rate established under
Subsection (1)(a) or (b) generates revenues for the county in an amount that
is less than the revenues that would be generated by the county under the
certified tax rate established in Section 59-2-924.
(b)  A county meeting the requirements of Subsection (2)(a) may impose a tax
rate that does not exceed the certified tax rate established in Section
59-2-924.
